Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.050

Educational programs for residential school residents—Contracts between school district and department of children, youth, and families—Scope.

Each school district required to conduct a program of education pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030, and the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall hereafter negotiate and execute a written contract for each school year or such longer period as may be agreed to which delineates the manner in which their respective duties and authority will be cooperatively performed and exercised, and any disputes and grievances resolved. Any such contract may provide for the performance of duties by a school district in addition to those set forth in RCW 28A.190.030 (1) through (5), including duties imposed upon the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families and their agents pursuant to RCW 28A.190.040: PROVIDED, That funds identified in RCW 28A.190.030(6) and/or funds provided by the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families are available to fully pay the direct and indirect costs of such additional duties and the district is otherwise authorized by law to perform such duties in connection with the maintenance and operation of a school district.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 723; 1990 c 33 s 174; 1979 ex.s. c 217 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.58.776.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 217: See note following RCW 28A.190.030.